Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-116
Students; equal privileges.

No person shall be deprived of the privileges of this institution because of age, sex, color or nationality.

Laws 1869, § 18, p. 177;

R.S.1913, § 7097;

C.S.1922, § 6729;

C.S.1929, § 85-115;

R.S.1943, § 85-116.

This section does not create a property interest sufficient to support an action alleging reverse sex discrimination in an intercollegiate sport. Fluitt v. University of Nebraska, 489 F.Supp. 1194 (D. Neb. 1980).